Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5744.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 234g. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), an individual who intentionally discharges a firearm at a motor vehicle that the individual knows or has reason to believe is occupied is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 10 years or a fine of not more than $10,000.00, or both. (2) An individual who violates subsection (1) and who knows or has reason to believe that the vehicle is occupied by a minor is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 20 years or a fine of not more than $20,000.00, or both. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This act may be cited as "Messiah's Law".